Hawaii statutes.
[§432D-6] Information to enrollees or
subscribers. (a) The health maintenance organization shall provide to its
subscribers a list of providers and participating providers, upon enrollment
and reenrollment.

(b) Every health maintenance organization shall
provide to its subscribers notice of any material change in the operation of
the organization that will affect them directly within thirty days of the
material change.

(c) The health maintenance organization shall
provide to subscribers information on how services may be obtained, where
additional information on access to services may be obtained, a description of
the internal grievance procedures, and a telephone number for the enrollee to
contact the health maintenance organization at no cost to the enrollee.

(d) For the purpose of this section
"material change" means any major change in provider or participating
provider agreements. [L 1995, c 179, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next